incubator/apertium-ru-uk.uk.dix
    <pardef n="той__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>той</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>той</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>та</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>те</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ті</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ті</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ті</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ті</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>того</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>того</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тієї</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>того</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тих</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тих</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тих</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тих</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тому</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тому</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тій</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тому</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тим</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тим</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тим</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тим</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>того</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>той</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ту</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>те</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тих</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ті</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ті</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ті</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тим</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тим</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тією</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тим</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тими</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тими</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тими</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тими</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тому</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>тім</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тому</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>тім</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тій</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тому</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>тім</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тих</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тих</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тих</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тих</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>той</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>той</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>та</l>
          <r>той<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>те</l>

    <e lm="той"><i></i><par n="той__det"/></e>
